Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 2. Wyoming Postsecondary Education Options Program

§ 21-20-201.
Agreement between districts and post-secondary education institutions required; student participation; credits; financial arrangements; transportation; accessibility; required annual reporting.

To provide a post secondary education enrollment options program under this section, a Wyoming school district board of trustees and a Wyoming community college district board of trustees or the University of Wyoming shall enter into an agreement whereby students resident of the participating district may attend post secondary education programs offered by the university or a participating community college. Effective for the 2011-2012 school year and each school year thereafter, the post secondary education enrollment options agreement shall comply with minimum educational standards defined by the commission in consultation with the department of education, community colleges and the University of Wyoming, including post secondary education enrollment options provided by means of distance education. Additional student eligibility requirements for program participation shall be based upon criteria established by the university or the community college in collaboration with the department of education, which address the high school grade level, uniform prior curricula requirements, academic achievement levels and national examination performance indicators.

An eligible student may, according to the agreement between the school district and the university or community college, enroll in a postsecondary education program offered at:

The university, a community college, an off-campus center or at a site meeting safety and accessibility requirements under the instruction of a faculty member;

A higher education center which is part of a college outreach cooperative education services agreement entered into by one (1) or more community college districts and one (1) or more school districts under W.S.

21-20-104

; or

A high school or other facility maintained by the participating district, under the instruction of a certified teacher employed by the district or by a faculty member of the institution entering into an agreement with the district.

A student participating in a postsecondary education enrollment options program pursuant to this section shall upon successfully completing any course offered under the program, receive academic credit by the resident school district which shall be counted towards the graduation requirements of the district. Evidence of successful completion of each course, the secondary credits granted and a statement that the credits were earned through program participation shall be made a part of the participating student’s records maintained by the district. In addition, the participating student shall receive postsecondary education credit for any course successfully completed under the program.

The school district and the university or community college district entering into an agreement for purposes of this section shall, if there are any fees within the agreement, establish fees to be assessed to the school district for student participation under the program, the payment schedule for the established fees and other necessary arrangements to facilitate fee payment and collection. Any textbooks, materials or equipment purchased under the established fees shall be addressed within the agreement entered into between the university or college and the school district. The university or community college shall not directly assess and collect any fee from the participating student for textbooks, materials, student services or any other fees otherwise assessed and collected from students attending the institution.

A student participating in the program shall be counted within the average daily membership of the resident school district as defined under W.S. 21-13-101(a)(i) and concurrently by the participating higher education institution for its full-time equivalent enrollment count. Effective September 1, 2012 and each September 1 thereafter, any school district or institution participating in an enrollment options program agreement under this section, including any board of cooperative educational services established under W.S.

21-20-104

and involved in the program, shall file a report with the community college commission on student participation and completion and on revenues and expenditures attributable to program activities for the immediately preceding school year. The report shall be based upon policy and guidelines developed by the statewide discussions conducted pursuant to section 2 of 2010 Senate File 39 as enacted into law. Not later than October 1 of each school year, the commission shall report to the joint education interim committee, the community colleges, the department of education and the University of Wyoming on statewide program revenues, expenditures and student participation and completion.

If the postsecondary education options program is offered at a facility operated by the university or participating community college which is located at a reasonable distance from the high school at which the participating student is enrolled, the district may provide for the transportation of the student between the high school and the location at which the program is offered. Costs incurred by the district under this subsection shall be included as part of the district transportation expenses as used in computing the district foundation program amount under W.S.

21-13-309

.

Nothing in this section prohibits a high school student from taking a college or university course apart from agreements outlined in this section if the student bears the cost.

Each school district board of trustees shall in conjunction with the University of Wyoming, community college district boards of trustees or other post secondary education institutions accredited by recognized and accepted accrediting agencies, make post secondary education options programs pursuant to this section reasonably accessible to eligible students.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 120, § 1; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 301(a), § 501; 2006, ch. 37, § 1; 2008, ch. 84, § 1; 2010, ch. 93, § 1; 2020 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, substituted “foundation program amount” for “amount per average daily membership (ADM)” in (f).

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, in (a), inserted “in collaboration with the department of education, which address the high school grade level, uniform prior curricula requirements, academic achievement levels and national examination performance indicators.”

The 2010 amendment,

in (a), inserted “To provide a post secondary education enrollment options program under this section, a,” substituted “shall enter into an agreement” for “may enter into an agreement to establish a postsecondary education enrollment options program” and added the second sentence; added the present second and third sentences in (e); and made stylistic changes in (a), (e) and (h).

Laws 2010, ch. 93 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (d) substituted “assessed to the school district” for “assessed the school district.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2010, ch. 93, § 2, provides: “(a) The community college commission shall conduct discussions to develop consensus on state seamless K-12 and post secondary education programs with relevant stakeholders. For purposes of this section, relevant stakeholders include representatives from the Wyoming community college commission, the seven (7) community colleges and the University of Wyoming, including administrators, faculty and board members, the department of education, school districts including administrators, teachers and counselors, and representatives of students and parents. Results of this discussion shall be used for developing state policy and guidelines for programs:

“(i) Bridging high school and post secondary education through concurrent and dual enrollment;

“(ii) Providing high school students an opportunity to earn at least twelve (12) college credits in addition to coursework meeting high school graduation requirements;

“(iii) Complying with criteria developed by the commission based upon consensus discussions, which prescribe statewide processes, procedures and required components for:

“(A) Determining program participation through statewide uniform eligibility requirements;

“(B) Establishing and maintaining quality of courses offered through dual and concurrent enrollment programs;

“(C) Assuring a technological infrastructure and delivery methods through dual and concurrent enrollment following nationally established best practices;

“(D) Assembling required articulation agreements between high schools and post secondary institutions pursuant to W.S. 21 20 201;

“(E) Communication mechanisms established for participating students and parents;

“(F) Student support services;

“(G) Parameters governing the use of weighted grades;

“(H) Establishing common student performance standards and expectations and establishing measures of student outcomes;

“(J) Course transferability between participating districts and post secondary institutions;

“(K) Data reporting and collection instruments and requirements providing the basis for program monitoring and evaluation;

“(M) Reporting and accountability of funding sources available to districts and post secondary education institutions for program provision.

“(b) A major component of state policy development under subsection (a) of this section shall include the establishment and maintenance of a data system compiling student enrollment, completion and outcome information for high school and post secondary education dual and concurrent enrollment programs. Efforts shall be coordinated with the transcript center within the department of education, and the longitudinal data collection effort under the Hathaway student scholarship program pursuant to 2008 Wyoming session laws, chapter 95, section 901.

“(c) In undertaking the consensus discussions and state policy development required under subsection (a) of this section, the community college commission shall give consideration to the role provided by distance education in developing criteria for providing access to dual and concurrent enrollment courses. For this purpose, the commission shall coordinate efforts with the university, community colleges and the Wyoming switchboard network administered by the department of education.

“(d) The community college commission may contract with appropriate persons and organizations to conduct the consensus discussions required under subsection (a) of this section and to assist with work necessary to establish policies and processes addressing issues identified in paragraphs (a)(i) through (iii) of this section. Progress on consensus discussions and policy development shall be periodically reported to the joint education interim committee, culminating in a final report to the committee to be submitted on or before January 1, 2011, which shall be comprised of policy recommendations on issues identified in this section, together with necessary enabling legislation. Broad public involvement shall be documented within the report, which shall serve as a basis for development of uniform policy on dual and concurrent enrollment programs.

“(e) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00) is appropriated from the school foundation program account to the community college commission for the period commencing upon the effective date of this section, and ending June 30, 2011. The commission shall expend monies appropriated under this section to conduct consensus discussions and to develop policy and processes specified under this section. The commission may use monies appropriated under this section to contract with appropriate persons and organizations as authorized under subsection (d) of this section.”